Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-715
Presidential electors; compensation.

The Secretary of State shall incorporate in his or her budget the sum of five hundred dollars for the payment of requests for payment or reimbursement presented by the presidential electors of the electoral college. The electors shall receive compensation of five dollars for each day of attendance and shall be reimbursed for mileage as provided in section 81-1176.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 215;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 71.